Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.260

Ascertaining the result—When recall effective.

The votes on a recall election must be counted, canvassed, and the results certified in the manner provided by law for counting, canvassing, and certifying the results of an election for the office from which the officer is being recalled. However, if the officer whose recall is demanded is the officer to whom, under the law, returns of elections are made, the returns must be made to the officer with whom the charge is filed, and who called the special election. In the case of an election for the recall of a state officer, the county canvassing boards of the various counties shall canvass and return the result of the election to the officer calling the special election. If a majority of all votes cast at the recall election is for the recall of the officer charged, the officer is thereupon recalled and discharged from the office, and the office thereupon is vacant.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1422; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 109; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.140. Prior: 1913 c 146 s 12; RRS s 5361. Formerly RCW 29.82.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Canvassing the returns: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.